Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201646-1103
Definitions,
sections found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Chemigation
Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections
46-1104 to 46-1116.01 shall apply.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB272, § 2.